District of Columbia statutes.
14-506

Certified mail return receipts as prima facie evidence of delivery.

Return receipts for the delivery of certified mail which is utilized under any provision of law shall be received in the courts as prima facie evidence of delivery to the same extent as return receipts for registered mail.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 14-506.
1973 Ed., § 14-506.